testdata/flag_matching/persian.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools fix -alignMonodix persian.dix persian.dix
-->
<dictionary>
	<alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyzx</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="mi:1" /> 
		<sdef n="xp:1" /> 
		<sdef n="xp:0" /> 
		<sdef n="mi:0" />
		<sdef n="bi:0" />
		<sdef n="bi:1" />
		<sdef n="p3" /> 
		<sdef n="p2" /> 
		<sdef n="prs" /> 
		<sdef n="p1" /> 
		<sdef n="inf" /> 
		<sdef n="sg" /> 
		<sdef n="vblex" /> 
		<sdef n="pri" /> 
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>
<!--
 lt-comp lr persian.dix persian-automorf.bin
 lt-comp rl persian.dix persian-autogen.bin


bikhodam:khodan<vblex><prs><p1><sg>
bikhodaš:khodan<vblex><prs><p2><sg>
bikhoda:khodan<vblex><prs><p3><sg>
mikhodam:khodan<vblex><pri><p1><sg>
mikhodaš:khodan<vblex><pri><p2><sg>
mikhoda:khodan<vblex><pri><p3><sg>
khodan:khodan<vblex><inf>

$ lt-expand persian.dix|   grep -v -e '<xp:1>.*<xp:0>' -e '<mi:1>.*<mi:0>' -e '<bi:1>.*<bi:0>'  -e '<bi:0>.*<bi:1>' -e '<mi:0>.*<mi:1>' -e '<xp:0>.*<xp:1>'
bikhodam:<bi:1>khodan<mi:0><xp:0><vblex><pri><p1><sg>
bikhodaš:<bi:1>khodan<mi:0><xp:0><vblex><pri><p2><sg>
bikhoda:<bi:1>khodan<mi:0><xp:0><vblex><pri><p3><sg>
mikhodam:<mi:1>khodan<bi:0><xp:0><vblex><prs><p1><sg>
mikhodaš:<mi:1>khodan<bi:0><xp:0><vblex><prs><p2><sg>
mikhoda:<mi:1>khodan<bi:0><xp:0><vblex><prs><p3><sg>
khodan:<xp:1>khodan<xp:1><bi:0><mi:0><vblex><inf>

  -->
<pardef n="prefix">
<!-- To form a complete path, all flags must agree, e.g.
     _bi_ must be set to '1' in all states with a flag -->

  <!-- 'bi-' is the prefix for indicative -->
  <e>       <p><l>bi</l>        <r><s n="bi:1"/></r></p></e>

  <!-- 'mi-' is the prefix for subjunctive -->
  <e>       <p><l>mi</l>        <r><s n="mi:1"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="xp:1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="khoda/n__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>m</l>         <r>n<s n="xp:0"/><s n="mi:1"/><s n="bi:0"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>m</l>         <r>n<s n="xp:0"/><s n="mi:0"/><s n="bi:1"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>š</l>         <r>n<s n="xp:0"/><s n="mi:1"/><s n="bi:0"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>š</l>         <r>n<s n="xp:0"/><s n="mi:0"/><s n="bi:1"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>n<s n="xp:0"/><s n="mi:1"/><s n="bi:0"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>n<s n="xp:0"/><s n="mi:0"/><s n="bi:1"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="xp:1"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
	</pardefs>

	<section id="main" type="standard">

<e lm="khodan">          <par n="prefix"/><i>khoda</i><par n="khoda/n__vblex"/></e>

	</section>
</dictionary>
